Washington statutes.
RCW 46.01.160

Forms for applications, certificates of title, registration certificates, etc.

The director shall prescribe and provide suitable forms of applications, certificates of title and registration certificates, drivers' licenses, and all other forms and licenses requisite or deemed necessary to carry out the provisions of this title and any other laws the enforcement and administration of which are vested in the department.

[ 2010 c 161 s 1109; 1965 c 156 s 16.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.

Director to prescribe forms for applications, licenses, and certificates: RCW 43.24.040.